Illinois, session 104th, HB3636.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Juvenile Court Act of 1987 is amended by 5changing Section 2-4b as follows: 6    (705 ILCS 405/2-4b)7    Sec. 2-4b. Family Support Program services; hearing.8    (a) Any minor who is placed in the custody or guardianship 9of the Department of Children and Family Services under 10Article II of this Act on the basis of a petition alleging that 11the minor is dependent because the minor was left at a 12psychiatric hospital beyond medical necessity, and for whom an 13application for the Family Support Program was pending with 14the Department of Healthcare and Family Services or an active 15application was being reviewed by the Department of Healthcare 16and Family Services at the time the petition was filed, shall 17continue to be considered eligible for services if all other 18eligibility criteria are met.19    (b) If a minor's guardian has submitted an application for 20the Family Support Program and that application is pending 21review or under active review to determine if the minor is 22eligible for the Family Support Program, and the minor is 23placed in the custody or guardianship of the Department of   HB3636- 2 -LRB104 11506 RLC 21595 b1Children and Family Services under Article II of this Act on 2the basis of a petition alleging that the minor is dependent 3because the minor was left at a psychiatric hospital beyond 4medical necessity, the minor's application will be expedited 5for review to determine if the minor is eligible for the Family 6Support Program.7    (b-1) If the application review determines that the minor 8is eligible for the Family Support Program, the court shall 9conduct a hearing within 14 days upon notification to all 10parties that an application for the Family Support Program 11services has been approved and services are available. The 12court shall conduct a hearing within 14 days upon notification 13to all parties that an application for the Family Support 14Program services has been approved and services are available. 15At the hearing, the court shall determine whether to vacate 16the custody or guardianship of the Department of Children and 17Family Services and return the minor to the custody of the 18respondent with Family Support Program services or whether the 19minor shall continue to be in the custody or guardianship of 20the Department of Children and Family Services and decline the 21Family Support Program services. In making its determination, 22the court shall consider the minor's best interest, the 23involvement of the respondent in proceedings under this Act, 24the involvement of the respondent in the minor's treatment, 25the relationship between the minor and the respondent, and any 26other factor the court deems relevant. If the court vacates   HB3636- 3 -LRB104 11506 RLC 21595 b1the custody or guardianship of the Department of Children and 2Family Services and returns the minor to the custody of the 3respondent with Family Support Services, the Department of 4Healthcare and Family Services shall become fiscally 5responsible for providing services to the minor. If the court 6determines that the minor shall continue in the custody of the 7Department of Children and Family Services, the Department of 8Children and Family Services shall remain fiscally responsible 9for providing services to the minor, the Family Support 10Services shall be declined, and the minor shall no longer be 11eligible for Family Support Services. 12    (c) This Section does not apply to a minor:13        (1) for whom a petition has been filed under this Act 14    alleging that the minor is an abused or neglected minor;15        (2) for whom the court has made a finding that the 16    minor is an abused or neglected minor under this Act; or17        (3) who is in the temporary custody of the Department 18    of Children and Family Services and the minor has been the 19    subject of an indicated allegation of abuse or neglect, 20    other than for psychiatric lockout, where a respondent was 21    the perpetrator within 5 years of the filing of the 22    pending petition. 23(Source: P.A. 103-22, eff. 8-8-23.)